src/morphology/stems/altstem-nouns.lexc
LEXICON N_LOKKI
!! The i stems combined with (quantitative) gradation of k will form five
!
!! € lokki
!! € lokissa
!! € lokkeina
!! € lokeista
!! € lokkien
0:ki       N_BACK_NOMINATIVE    ;
0:ki       N_BACK_STRONG_SINGULARS    ;
0:i     N_BACK_WEAK_SINGULARS    ;
0:ke    N_BACK_STRONG_PLURALS   ;
0:e     N_BACK_WEAK_PLURALS   ;
0:ki       N_BACK_PARTITIVE_A_AN  ;
0:ki       N_BACK_ILLATIVE_IN ;
0:ke     N_BACK_PARTITIVE_JA    ;
0:k     N_BACK_GENITIVE_IEN    ;
0:ke     N_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;
0:ki       N_COMPOUND_0   ;
0:i        N_COMPOUND_N   ;
0:k        N_COMPOUND_IEN ;

LEXICON N_HÄKKI
!
!! € häkki
!! € häkissä
!! € häkkeinä
!! € häkeistä
!! € häkkien
0:ki       N_FRONT_NOMINATIVE    ;
0:ki       N_FRONT_STRONG_SINGULARS    ;
0:i     N_FRONT_WEAK_SINGULARS    ;
0:ke    N_FRONT_STRONG_PLURALS   ;
0:e     N_FRONT_WEAK_PLURALS   ;
0:ki       N_FRONT_PARTITIVE_Ä_ÄN  ;
0:ki       N_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IN ;
0:ke     N_FRONT_PARTITIVE_JÄ    ;
0:k     N_FRONT_GENITIVE_IEN    ;
0:ke     N_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;
0:ki       N_COMPOUND_0   ;
0:i        N_COMPOUND_N   ;
0:k        N_COMPOUND_IEN ;

LEXICON N_KUPPI
!! € kuppi
!! € kupissa
!! € kuppeina
!! € kupeista
!! € kuppien
0:pi       N_BACK_NOMINATIVE    ;
0:pi       N_BACK_STRONG_SINGULARS    ;
0:i     N_BACK_WEAK_SINGULARS    ;
0:pe    N_BACK_STRONG_PLURALS   ;
0:e     N_BACK_WEAK_PLURALS   ;
0:pi       N_BACK_PARTITIVE_A_AN  ;
0:pi       N_BACK_ILLATIVE_IN ;
0:pe    N_BACK_PARTITIVE_JA    ;
0:p     N_BACK_GENITIVE_IEN    ;
0:pe    N_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;
0:pi       N_COMPOUND_0   ;
0:i        N_COMPOUND_N   ;
0:p        N_COMPOUND_IEN ;

LEXICON N_TYYPPI
!! € tyyppi
!! € tyypissä
!! € tyyppeinä
!! € tyypeistä
!! € tyyppien
0:pi       N_FRONT_NOMINATIVE    ;
0:pi       N_FRONT_STRONG_SINGULARS    ;
0:i     N_FRONT_WEAK_SINGULARS    ;
0:pe    N_FRONT_STRONG_PLURALS   ;
0:e     N_FRONT_WEAK_PLURALS   ;
0:pi       N_FRONT_PARTITIVE_Ä_ÄN  ;
0:pi       N_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IN ;
0:pe    N_FRONT_PARTITIVE_JÄ    ;
0:p     N_FRONT_GENITIVE_IEN    ;
0:pe    N_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;
0:pi       N_COMPOUND_0   ;
0:i        N_COMPOUND_N   ;
0:p        N_COMPOUND_IEN ;

LEXICON N_PORTTI
!! € kortti
!! € kortissa
!! € kortteina
!! € korteista
!! € korttien
0:ti       N_BACK_NOMINATIVE    ;
0:ti       N_BACK_STRONG_SINGULARS    ;
0:i     N_BACK_WEAK_SINGULARS    ;
0:te    N_BACK_STRONG_PLURALS   ;
0:e     N_BACK_WEAK_PLURALS   ;
0:ti       N_BACK_PARTITIVE_A_AN  ;
0:ti       N_BACK_ILLATIVE_IN ;
0:te    N_BACK_PARTITIVE_JA    ;
0:t     N_BACK_GENITIVE_IEN    ;
0:te    N_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;
0:ti       N_COMPOUND_0   ;
0:i        N_COMPOUND_N   ;
0:t        N_COMPOUND_IEN ;



LEXICON N_SKEITTI
!! € skeitti
!! € skeitissä
!! € skeitteinä
!! € skeiteistä
!! € skeittien
0:ti       N_FRONT_NOMINATIVE    ;
0:ti       N_FRONT_STRONG_SINGULARS    ;
0:i       N_FRONT_WEAK_SINGULARS    ;
0:te     N_FRONT_STRONG_PLURALS   ;
0:e     N_FRONT_WEAK_PLURALS   ;
0:ti       N_FRONT_PARTITIVE_Ä_ÄN  ;
0:ti       N_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IN ;
0:te     N_FRONT_PARTITIVE_JÄ    ;
0:t     N_FRONT_GENITIVE_IEN    ;
0:te     N_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;
0:ti       N_COMPOUND_0   ;
0:i       N_COMPOUND_N   ;
0:t       N_COMPOUND_IEN ;

LEXICON N_LAKI
!! € laki
!! € laissa
!! € la’issa
!! € lakeina
!! € laeista
!! € la’eista
!! € lakien
0:ki       N_BACK_NOMINATIVE    ;
0:ki       N_BACK_STRONG_SINGULARS    ;
0:i     N_BACK_WEAK_SINGULARS    ;
0:’i     N_BACK_WEAK_SINGULARS    ;
0:ke    N_BACK_STRONG_PLURALS   ;
0:e     N_BACK_WEAK_PLURALS   ;
0:ki       N_BACK_PARTITIVE_A_AN  ;
0:ki       N_BACK_ILLATIVE_IN ;
0:ke     N_BACK_PARTITIVE_JA    ;
0:k     N_BACK_GENITIVE_IEN    ;
0:ke     N_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;
0:ki       N_COMPOUND_0   ;
0:i        N_COMPOUND_N   ;
0:k        N_COMPOUND_IEN ;

LEXICON N_HUPI
!! € hupi
!! € huvissa
!! € hupeina
!! € huveista
!! € hupien
0:pi       N_BACK_NOMINATIVE    ;
0:pi       N_BACK_STRONG_SINGULARS    ;
0:vi     N_BACK_WEAK_SINGULARS    ;
0:pe    N_BACK_STRONG_PLURALS   ;
0:ve     N_BACK_WEAK_PLURALS   ;
0:pi       N_BACK_PARTITIVE_A_AN  ;
0:pi       N_BACK_ILLATIVE_IN ;
0:pe    N_BACK_PARTITIVE_JA    ;
0:p     N_BACK_GENITIVE_IEN    ;
0:pe    N_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;
0:pi       N_COMPOUND_0   ;
0:vi        N_COMPOUND_N   ;
0:p        N_COMPOUND_IEN ;

!LEXICON N_XXPI
! No examples
!0:pi       N_FRONT_NOMINATIVE    ;
!0:pi       N_FRONT_STRONG_SINGULARS    ;
!:vi     N_FRONT_WEAK_SINGULARS    ;
!:pe    N_FRONT_STRONG_PLURALS   ;
!:ve     N_FRONT_WEAK_PLURALS   ;
!0:pi       N_FRONT_PARTITIVE_Ä_ÄN  ;
!0:pi       N_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IN ;
!:pe    N_FRONT_PARTITIVE_JÄ    ;
!:p     N_FRONT_GENITIVE_IEN    ;
!:pe    N_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;
!0:pi       N_COMPOUND_0   ;
!0:i        N_COMPOUND_N   ;
!0:p        N_COMPOUND_IEN ;


LEXICON N_TAUTI
!! € tauti
!! € taudissa
!! € tauteina
!! € taudeista
!! € tautien
0:ti       N_BACK_NOMINATIVE    ;
0:ti       N_BACK_STRONG_SINGULARS    ;
0:di     N_BACK_WEAK_SINGULARS    ;
0:te    N_BACK_STRONG_PLURALS   ;
0:de     N_BACK_WEAK_PLURALS   ;
0:ti       N_BACK_PARTITIVE_A_AN  ;
0:ti       N_BACK_ILLATIVE_IN ;
0:te    N_BACK_PARTITIVE_JA    ;
0:t     N_BACK_GENITIVE_IEN    ;
0:te    N_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;
0:ti       N_COMPOUND_0   ;
0:di        N_COMPOUND_N   ;
0:t        N_COMPOUND_IEN ;

LEXICON N_NIHTI
!! € nihti
!! € nihdissä
!! € nihteinä
!! € nihdeistä
!! € nihtien
0:ti       N_FRONT_NOMINATIVE    ;
0:ti       N_FRONT_STRONG_SINGULARS    ;
0:di     N_FRONT_WEAK_SINGULARS    ;
0:te    N_FRONT_STRONG_PLURALS   ;
0:de     N_FRONT_WEAK_PLURALS   ;
0:ti       N_FRONT_PARTITIVE_Ä_ÄN  ;
0:ti       N_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IN ;
0:te    N_FRONT_PARTITIVE_JÄ    ;
0:t     N_FRONT_GENITIVE_IEN    ;
0:te    N_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;
0:ti       N_COMPOUND_0   ;
0:di       N_COMPOUND_N   ;
0:t        N_COMPOUND_IEN ;

LEXICON N_VANKI
!! € vanki
!! € vangissa
!! € vankeina
!! € vangeista
!! € vankien
0:ki       N_BACK_NOMINATIVE    ;
0:ki       N_BACK_STRONG_SINGULARS    ;
0:gi     N_BACK_WEAK_SINGULARS    ;
0:ke    N_BACK_STRONG_PLURALS   ;
0:ge     N_BACK_WEAK_PLURALS   ;
0:ki       N_BACK_PARTITIVE_A_AN  ;
0:ki       N_BACK_ILLATIVE_IN ;
0:ke    N_BACK_PARTITIVE_JA    ;
0:k     N_BACK_GENITIVE_IEN    ;
0:ke    N_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;
0:ki       N_COMPOUND_0   ;
0:gi        N_COMPOUND_N   ;
0:k        N_COMPOUND_IEN ;

LEXICON N_HÄMMINKI
!! € väylinki
!! € väylingissä
!! € väylinkeinä
!! € väylingeistä
!! € väylinkien
0:ki       N_FRONT_NOMINATIVE    ;
0:ki       N_FRONT_STRONG_SINGULARS    ;
0:gi     N_FRONT_WEAK_SINGULARS    ;
0:ke    N_FRONT_STRONG_PLURALS   ;
0:ge     N_FRONT_WEAK_PLURALS   ;
0:ki       N_FRONT_PARTITIVE_Ä_ÄN  ;
0:ki       N_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IN ;
0:ke    N_FRONT_PARTITIVE_JÄ    ;
0:k     N_FRONT_GENITIVE_IEN    ;
0:ke    N_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;
0:ki       N_COMPOUND_0   ;
0:gi       N_COMPOUND_N   ;
0:k        N_COMPOUND_IEN ;

!LEXICON N_XXLTI
! No examples
!0:ti       N_BACK_NOMINATIVE    ;
!0:ti       N_BACK_STRONG_SINGULARS    ;
!:li     N_BACK_WEAK_SINGULARS    ;
!:te    N_BACK_STRONG_PLURALS   ;
!:le     N_BACK_WEAK_PLURALS   ;
!0:ti       N_BACK_PARTITIVE_A_AN  ;
!0:ti       N_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IN ;
!:te    N_BACK_PARTITIVE_JA    ;
!:t     N_FRONT_GENITIVE_IEN    ;
!:te    N_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;
!0:ti       N_COMPOUND_0   ;
!0:li        N_COMPOUND_N   ;
!0:t        N_COMPOUND_IEN ;

LEXICON N_PELTI
!! € pelti
!! € pellissä
!! € pelteinä
!! € pelleistä
!! € peltien
0:ti       N_FRONT_NOMINATIVE    ;
0:ti       N_FRONT_STRONG_SINGULARS    ;
0:li     N_FRONT_WEAK_SINGULARS    ;
0:te    N_FRONT_STRONG_PLURALS   ;
0:le     N_FRONT_WEAK_PLURALS   ;
0:ti       N_FRONT_PARTITIVE_Ä_ÄN  ;
0:ti       N_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IN ;
0:te    N_FRONT_PARTITIVE_JÄ    ;
0:t     N_FRONT_GENITIVE_IEN    ;
0:te    N_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;
0:ti       N_COMPOUND_0   ;
0:li       N_COMPOUND_N   ;
0:t        N_COMPOUND_IEN ;

LEXICON N_SOINTI
!! € sointi
!! € soinnissa
!! € sointeina
!! € soinneista
!! € sointien
0:ti       N_BACK_NOMINATIVE    ;
0:ti       N_BACK_STRONG_SINGULARS    ;
0:ni     N_BACK_WEAK_SINGULARS    ;
0:te    N_BACK_STRONG_PLURALS   ;
0:ne     N_BACK_WEAK_PLURALS   ;
0:ti       N_BACK_PARTITIVE_A_AN  ;
0:ti       N_BACK_ILLATIVE_IN ;
0:te    N_BACK_PARTITIVE_JA    ;
0:t     N_BACK_GENITIVE_IEN    ;
0:te    N_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;
0:ti       N_COMPOUND_0   ;
0:ni        N_COMPOUND_N   ;
0:t        N_COMPOUND_IEN ;

LEXICON N_VIENTI
!! € vienti
!! € viennissä
!! € vienteinä
!! € vienneistä
!! € vientien
0:ti       N_FRONT_NOMINATIVE    ;
0:ti       N_FRONT_STRONG_SINGULARS    ;
0:ni     N_FRONT_WEAK_SINGULARS    ;
0:te    N_FRONT_STRONG_PLURALS   ;
0:ne     N_FRONT_WEAK_PLURALS   ;
0:ti       N_FRONT_PARTITIVE_Ä_ÄN  ;
0:ti       N_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IN ;
0:te    N_FRONT_PARTITIVE_JÄ    ;
0:t     N_FRONT_GENITIVE_IEN    ;
0:te    N_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;
0:ti       N_COMPOUND_0   ;
0:ni       N_COMPOUND_N   ;
0:t        N_COMPOUND_IEN ;

LEXICON N_PUNK
!! New loan words ending in consonant may be inflected as i stem words
!! € punk
!! € punkeina
!! € punkien
0        N_BACK_NOMINATIVE    ;
0:i       N_BACK_SINGULARS    ;
0:e     N_BACK_PLURALS   ;
0:i       N_BACK_PARTITIVE_A_AN  ;
0:i       N_BACK_ILLATIVE_IN ;
0:e     N_BACK_PARTITIVE_JA    ;
0     N_BACK_GENITIVE_IEN    ;
0:e     N_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;
0       N_COMPOUND_0   ;
0:i       N_COMPOUND_N   ;
0       N_COMPOUND_IEN ;

LEXICON N_ZEN
!! New loan words ending in consonant may be inflected as i stem words
!! € zen
!! € zeneinä
!! € zenien
0        N_FRONT_NOMINATIVE    ;
0:i       N_FRONT_SINGULARS    ;
0:e     N_FRONT_PLURALS   ;
0:i       N_FRONT_PARTITIVE_Ä_ÄN  ;
0:i       N_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IN ;
0:e     N_FRONT_PARTITIVE_JÄ    ;
0     N_FRONT_GENITIVE_IEN    ;
0:e     N_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;
0       N_COMPOUND_0   ;
0:i       N_COMPOUND_N   ;
0       N_COMPOUND_IEN ;

LEXICON N_TANKKERI
!! trisyllabic i : e : 0 variation:
!! € kanaali
!! € kanaaleja
!! € kanaaleiden
0:i       N_BACK_NOMINATIVE    ;
0:i       N_BACK_SINGULARS    ;
0:e     N_BACK_PLURALS   ;
0:i       N_BACK_PARTITIVE_A_AN  ;
0:i       N_BACK_ILLATIVE_IN ;
0:e     N_BACK_PARTITIVE_JA    ;
0:e     N_BACK_PARTITIVE_ITA   ;
0:e     N_BACK_GENITIVE_IDEN  ;
0:e     N_BACK_GENITIVE_ITTEN ;
0     N_BACK_GENITIVE_IEN    ;
0:e     N_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;
0:i       N_COMPOUND_0   ;
0:i       N_COMPOUND_N   ;
0       N_COMPOUND_IEN ;
0:e       N_COMPOUND_IDEN ;
0:e       N_COMPOUND_ITTEN   ;

LEXICON N_KEHVELI
!
!! € kehveli
!! € kehvelejä
!! € kehveleiden
0:i       N_FRONT_NOMINATIVE    ;
0:i       N_FRONT_SINGULARS    ;
0:e     N_FRONT_PLURALS   ;
0:i       N_FRONT_PARTITIVE_Ä_ÄN  ;
0:i       N_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IN ;
0:e     N_FRONT_PARTITIVE_ITÄ    ;
0:e     N_FRONT_PARTITIVE_JÄ    ;
0:e     N_FRONT_GENITIVE_IDEN   ;
0:e     N_FRONT_GENITIVE_ITTEN   ;
0     N_FRONT_GENITIVE_IEN    ;
0:e     N_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;
0:i       N_COMPOUND_0   ;
0:i       N_COMPOUND_N   ;
0       N_COMPOUND_IEN ;
0:e       N_COMPOUND_IDEN ;
0:e       N_COMPOUND_ITTEN ;

LEXICON N_STADION
!! € stadion
!! € stadioneja
!! € stadioneiden
0       N_BACK_NOMINATIVE    ;
0:i       N_BACK_SINGULARS    ;
0:e     N_BACK_PLURALS   ;
0:i       N_BACK_PARTITIVE_A_AN  ;
0:i       N_BACK_ILLATIVE_IN ;
0:e     N_BACK_PARTITIVE_JA    ;
0:e     N_BACK_PARTITIVE_ITA   ;
0:e     N_BACK_GENITIVE_IDEN  ;
0:e     N_BACK_GENITIVE_ITTEN ;
0     N_BACK_GENITIVE_IEN    ;
0:e     N_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;
0       N_COMPOUND_0   ;
0:i       N_COMPOUND_N   ;
0       N_COMPOUND_IEN ;
0:e       N_COMPOUND_IDEN ;
0:e       N_COMPOUND_ITTEN   ;
